Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3404
Nonexclusivity.

The Nebraska Uniform
Real Property Transfer on Death Act does not affect any method of transferring
property otherwise permitted under the law of this state.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 4.